New York, session 2025-2026, A9394.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 3 and 11 of section 120.05 of the penal law, 2 subdivision 3 as amended by chapter 267 of the laws of 2016 and subdivi- 3 sion 11 as amended by section 2 of part Z of chapter 55 of the laws of 4 2024, are amended to read as follows: 5 3. With intent to prevent a peace officer, a police officer, prosecu- 6 tor as defined in subdivision thirty-one of section 1.20 of the criminal 7 procedure law, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, public health 8 sanitarian, New York city public health sanitarian, sanitation enforce- 9 ment agent, New York city sanitation worker, a firefighter, including a 10 firefighter acting as a paramedic or emergency medical technician admin- 11 istering first aid in the course of performance of duty as such fire- 12 fighter, an emergency medical service paramedic or emergency medical 13 service technician, or medical or related personnel in a hospital emer- 14 gency department, a city marshal, a school crossing guard appointed 15 pursuant to section two hundred eight-a of the general municipal law, a 16 traffic enforcement officer, traffic enforcement agent or employee of 17 any entity governed by the public service law in the course of perform- 18 ing an essential service, or employee of a secure or limited secure 19 residential facility licensed, certified or operated by the office of 20 children and family services, from performing a lawful duty, by means 21 including releasing or failing to control an animal under circumstances 22 evincing the actor's intent that the animal obstruct the lawful activity 23 of such peace officer, police officer, prosecutor as defined in subdivi- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08579-01-5 A. 9394 2 1 sion thirty-one of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law, regis- 2 tered nurse, licensed practical nurse, public health sanitarian, New 3 York city public health sanitarian, sanitation enforcement agent, New 4 York city sanitation worker, firefighter, paramedic, technician, city 5 marshal, school crossing guard appointed pursuant to section two hundred 6 eight-a of the general municipal law, traffic enforcement officer, traf- 7 fic enforcement agent or employee of an entity governed by the public 8 service law, [he or she] or employee of a secure or limited secure resi- 9 dential facility licensed, certified or operated by the office of chil- 10 dren and family services, such person causes physical injury to such 11 peace officer, police officer, prosecutor as defined in subdivision 12 thirty-one of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law, registered 13 nurse, licensed practical nurse, public health sanitarian, New York city 14 public health sanitarian, sanitation enforcement agent, New York city 15 sanitation worker, firefighter, paramedic, technician or medical or 16 related personnel in a hospital emergency department, city marshal, 17 school crossing guard, traffic enforcement officer, traffic enforcement 18 agent or employee of an entity governed by the public service law, or 19 employee of a secure or limited secure residential facility licensed, 20 certified or operated by the office of children and family services; or 21 11. With intent to cause physical injury to a train operator, ticket 22 inspector, conductor, signalperson, bus operator, station agent, station 23 cleaner, terminal cleaner, station customer assistant, traffic checker; 24 person whose official duties include the sale or collection of tickets, 25 passes, vouchers, or other revenue payment media for use on a train, 26 bus, or ferry the collection or handling of revenues therefrom; a person 27 whose official duties include the maintenance, repair, inspection, trou- 28 bleshooting, testing or cleaning of buses or ferries, a transit signal 29 system, elevated or underground subway tracks, transit station struc- 30 ture, including fare equipment, escalators, elevators and other equip- 31 ment necessary to passenger service, commuter rail tracks or stations, 32 train yard, revenue train in passenger service, a ferry station, or a 33 train or bus station or terminal; or a supervisor of such personnel, 34 employed by any transit or commuter rail agency, authority or company, 35 public or private, whose operation is authorized by New York state or 36 any of its political subdivisions, a city marshal, a school crossing 37 guard appointed pursuant to section two hundred eight-a of the general 38 municipal law, a traffic enforcement officer, traffic enforcement agent, 39 prosecutor as defined in subdivision thirty-one of section 1.20 of the 40 criminal procedure law, sanitation enforcement agent, New York city 41 sanitation worker, public health sanitarian, New York city public health 42 sanitarian, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, emergency 43 medical service paramedic, [or] emergency medical service technician, 44 [he or she] or employee of a secure or limited secure residential facil- 45 ity licensed, certified or operated by the office of children and family 46 services, such person causes physical injury to such train operator, 47 ticket inspector, conductor, signalperson, bus operator, station agent, 48 station cleaner, terminal cleaner, station customer assistant, traffic 49 checker; person whose official duties include the sale or collection of 50 tickets, passes, vouchers or other revenue payment media for use on a 51 train, bus, or ferry or the collection or handling of revenues there- 52 from; a person whose official duties include the maintenance, repair, 53 inspection, troubleshooting, testing or cleaning of buses or ferries, a 54 transit signal system, elevated or underground subway tracks, transit 55 station structure, including fare equipment, escalators, elevators and 56 other equipment necessary to passenger service, commuter rail tracks or A. 9394 3 1 stations, train yard, revenue train in passenger service, a ferry 2 station, or a train or bus station or terminal; or a supervisor of such 3 personnel, city marshal, school crossing guard appointed pursuant to 4 section two hundred eight-a of the general municipal law, traffic 5 enforcement officer, traffic enforcement agent, prosecutor as defined in 6 subdivision thirty-one of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law, 7 registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, public health sanitarian, 8 New York city public health sanitarian, sanitation enforcement agent, 9 New York city sanitation worker, emergency medical service paramedic, 10 [or] emergency medical service technician, or employee of a secure or 11 limited secure residential facility licensed, certified or operated by 12 the office of children and family services, while such employee is 13 performing an assigned duty on, or directly related to, the operation of 14 a train or bus, cleaning of a train or bus station or terminal, assist- 15 ing customers, checking traffic, the sale or collection of tickets, 16 passes, vouchers, or other revenue media for use on a train, bus, or 17 ferry or maintenance or cleaning of a train, a bus, a ferry, or bus 18 station or terminal, signal system, elevated or underground subway 19 tracks, transit station structure, including fare equipment, escalators, 20 elevators and other equipment necessary to passenger service, commuter 21 rail tracks or stations, train yard or revenue train in passenger 22 service, a ferry station, or such city marshal, school crossing guard, 23 traffic enforcement officer, traffic enforcement agent, prosecutor as 24 defined in subdivision thirty-one of section 1.20 of the criminal proce- 25 dure law, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, public health 26 sanitarian, New York city public health sanitarian, sanitation enforce- 27 ment agent, New York city sanitation worker, emergency medical service 28 paramedic, [or] emergency medical service technician, or employee of a 29 secure or limited secure residential facility licensed, certified or 30 operated by the office of children and family services is performing an 31 assigned duty; or 32 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.